Washington statutes.
RCW 24.34.020

Monopoly or restraint of trade—Complaint—Procedure.

If the attorney general has reason to believe that any such association as provided for in RCW 24.34.010 monopolizes or restrains trade to such an extent that the price of any agricultural product is unduly enhanced by reason thereof, he or she shall serve upon such association a complaint stating his or her charge in that respect, to which complaint shall be attached, or contained therein, a notice of hearing, specifying a day and place not less than thirty days after the service thereof, requiring the association to show cause why an order should not be made directing it to cease and desist from monopolization or restraint of trade.

Such hearing, and any appeal which may be made from such hearing, shall be conducted and held subject to and in conformance with the provisions for adjudicative proceedings and judicial review in chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

[ 2011 c 336 s 675; 1989 c 175 s 75; 1967 c 187 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.